New Jersey, session 221, A3115.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Police Training Commission established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-70) shall approve and authorize schools to provide training to auxiliary police officers.  Each auxiliary police officer shall successfully complete basic training requirements established by the commission pursuant to P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-66 et seq.). An auxiliary police officer appointed prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may continue to serve in that capacity provided the officer satisfies the training requirements established by the commission within six months following the effective date of this act. b.   A county or municipality in which Title, Civil Service, of the Revised Statutes is operative that schedules an examination to determine appointments to a county or municipal law enforcement agency shall award additional rating points of not less than three or more than 10 as may be determined by the appointing authority to any qualified auxiliary police officer who had served in the county or municipal law enforcement agency for at least two years prior to the appointment. The service credit only shall be added to the passing score of any auxiliary police officer who has successfully completed a basic police training course approved by the Police Training Commission at an approved school. c.   Nothing in this section shall establish a preference over a paid police officer temporarily dismissed or on leave of absence for reasons of economy, or the appointment of a paid police officer to a superior position at the time of promotion in the police department or force. d.   The Civil Service Commission may promulgate, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations and establish administrative processes as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.